New York, session 2025-2026, A6006.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breeding law is 2 amended by adding a new section 902-a to read as follows: 3 § 902-a. Equine screening and advanced imaging expenses. 1. In order 4 to assure the public's confidence and continue the high degree of integ- 5 rity in racing at the pari-mutuel betting tracks, clinical services 6 related to screening and advanced imaging shall be conducted by a land 7 grant university within this state at a location proximate to a race- 8 track owned by the state. 9 2. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the land grant 10 university's costs of operating such preventive screening and advanced 11 imaging services shall be offset by an assessment collected by the 12 commission pursuant to subdivision seven of section one thousand 13 twelve-a of this chapter, and distributed by the commission to such land 14 grant university. The commission shall determine the distribution sched- 15 ule of such assessments to the land grant university outlined in this 16 subdivision, provided that such distributions occur in a reasonable 17 amount of time subsequent to the commission collecting such assessments. 18 3. In consideration of the state and industry support provided for the 19 screening and advanced imaging services to the land grant university: 20 (a) the clinical services shall be provided for the benefit of New York 21 horsemen at reasonable costs; and (b) any data or educational material 22 generated from such program shall be shared with the commission and any 23 entity licensed or franchised pursuant to article one or two of this 24 chapter. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09464-01-5 A. 6006 2 1 § 2. Subdivision 6 of section 1012-a of the racing, pari-mutuel wager- 2 ing and breeding law, as amended by chapter 243 of the laws of 2020, is 3 amended and a new subdivision 7 is added to read as follows: 4 6. multi-jurisdictional account wagering providers shall pay a market 5 origin fee equal to five percent on each wager accepted from New York 6 residents. Multi-jurisdictional account wagering providers shall make 7 the required payments to the market origin account on or before the 8 fifth business day of each month and such required payments shall cover 9 payments due for the period of the preceding calendar month; provided, 10 however, that such payments required to be made on April fifteenth shall 11 be accompanied by a report under oath, showing the total of all such 12 payments, together with such other information as the commission may 13 require. A penalty of five percent and interest at the rate of one 14 percent per month from the date the report is required to be filed to 15 the date the payment shall be payable in case any payments required by 16 this subdivision are not paid when due. If the commission determines 17 that any moneys received under this subdivision were paid in error, the 18 commission may cause the same to be refunded without interest out of any 19 moneys collected thereunder, provided an application therefor is filed 20 with the commission within one year from the time the erroneous payment 21 was made. The commission shall pay into the racing regulation account, 22 under the joint custody of the comptroller and the commission, the total 23 amount of the fee collected pursuant to this section[.]; and 24 7. any multi-jurisdictional account wagering providers that are not 25 controlled by an entity otherwise licensed or franchised in this state 26 to conduct pari-mutuel wagering pursuant to article two or three of this 27 chapter through which New York residents have wagered an aggregate 28 amount of at least fifteen million dollars in every month of calendar 29 year two thousand twenty-four shall pay an additional assessment of 0.03 30 percent not to exceed one million dollars in calendar year two thousand 31 twenty-five, and 0.05 percent not to exceed one million seven hundred 32 fifty thousand dollars in calendar years two thousand twenty-six through 33 two thousand thirty, which shall be distributed pursuant to section nine 34 hundred two-a of this chapter. This assessment shall continue only as 35 long as necessary to fund the operations of the screening and advanced 36 imaging clinical services described in such section. 37 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire March 31, 38 2030 when upon such date the provisions of this act shall be deemed 39 repealed.